Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-103 Corporation law applies in
general. The laws of this State relating to private corporations, except
where inconsistent with the express provisions of this code, shall apply to
incorporated domestic insurers. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next